Utah statutes.
20A-4-501.   Election returns -- Forgery.

(1)  It is unlawful for any person to:

(a)  forge or counterfeit any election returns from any election purporting to have been held at any voting precinct where no election was in fact held;

(b)  willfully substitute any forged or counterfeit election returns in the place of the true return for a voting precinct where any election was actually held; or

(c)  commit or cause any fraud in any election in any manner.

(2)  Each person who violates this section may be sentenced to imprisonment in the state prison for a term of not less than two nor more than 10 years.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1993 General Session

